Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Certified Nurse Aides.

Sec. 08.68.331.
Certification of nurse aides.

The board or the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, as designated by the board, shall issue certification as a nurse aide to qualified applicants. The board, after consultation with affected agencies, may adopt regulations regarding the certification of nurse aides, including

the training, educational, and other qualifications for certification that will ensure that the nurse aides are competent to perform the tasks of their occupation;

application, certification, renewal, and revocation procedures; and

maintenance of a registry of certified nurse aides.

The board may

conduct hearings upon charges of alleged violations of this chapter or regulations adopted under it; and

invoke, or request the department to invoke, disciplinary action under AS

08.01.075

against a certified nurse aide.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.

Sec. 08.68.332.
Use of title.

A person may not use the title “certified nurse aide” or the abbreviation “C.N.A.” unless the person is certified under this chapter.

A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.

Sec. 08.68.333.
Registry of certified nurse aides.

The board shall maintain a registry of certified nurse aides. At a minimum, this registry must include the information required under federal regulations that are applicable to nurse aides found to have committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property in connection with their employment by a facility participating in the Medicaid or Medicare program.

If the board finds that a certified nurse aide has committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property in connection with employment as a nurse aide, the board shall revoke the nurse aide’s certification and enter the finding in the registry.

Upon receiving a notice of a finding under AS

47.05.055

that a certified nurse aide has committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property, the board shall immediately revoke the nurse aide’s certification without a hearing, enter the finding in the registry, and notify the nurse aide of the revocation and entry of the finding. Notice is considered given when delivered personally to the nurse aide or deposited in the United States mail addressed to the nurse aide’s last known mailing address on file with the board. The department shall retain proof of mailing.

If the certified nurse aide is employed in a skilled nursing facility or a nursing facility, other than an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, that is participating in the Medicaid or Medicare program, only the state survey and certification agency may make, and report to the board, a finding that the certified nurse aide has committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property in connection with the nurse aide’s employment at the facility.

The board shall establish procedures under which a finding under AS

47.05.055

that a certified nurse aide has committed abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property and the resulting revocation of certification will be removed from the registry if the certified nurse aide requests a hearing and can establish mistaken identity or the finding has been set aside by the reporting agency or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

do not apply to actions taken under (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.

Sec. 08.68.334.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of certificate.

The board may deny a certification to, or impose a disciplinary sanction authorized under AS

08.01.075

against, a person who

has obtained or attempted to obtain certification as a nurse aide by fraud, deceit, or intentional misrepresentation;

has been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a certified nurse aide;

has impersonated a registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nurse or other licensed health care provider;

has intentionally or negligently engaged in conduct that has resulted in a significant risk to the health or safety of a client or in injury to a client;

is incapable of working as a certified nurse aide with reasonable skill, competence, and safety for the public because of

professional incompetence;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or a drug that impairs the licensee’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability; or

other factors determined by the board;

has knowingly or repeatedly failed to comply with this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board; or

has misappropriated the property of, abused, or neglected a client.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 16 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (3), inserted “,advanced practice registered,” following “registered”.

Sec. 08.68.335.
Immunity for certain reports to the board.

A person who, in good faith, reports information to the board relating to alleged incidents of incompetent, unprofessional, or unlawful conduct of a certified nurse aide is not liable in a civil action for damages resulting from the reporting of the information.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.68.336.
Fees.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for certified nurse aides for each of the following:

application;

examination;

certification; and

renewal of certification.

History.

(§ 5 ch 2 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.